2_Optimized Recursive File Scanning & Data Extraction /analyzedir/tests/tests-2/test5/hyph-gl.pat.txt
3??3a
a1a
e1e
o1o
zo2o
a1??
e1??
o1??
2ai.
2au.
2ei.
2eu.
2oi.
2ou.
a1ia
a1ie
a1io
a1i??
e1ia
e1ie
e1io
e1i??
o1ia
o1ie
o1io
o1i??
u1ia
u1ie
u1io
u1i??
2ia.
2ie.
2io.
2i??.
1??
1ba
1be
1bi
1bo
1bu
1b??
1b??
1b??
1b??
1b??
1ca
1ce
1ci
1co
1cu
1c??
1c??
1c??
1c??
1c??
1da
1de
1di
1do
1du
1d??
1d??
1d??
1d??
1d??
1fa
1fe
1fi
1fo
1fu
1f??
1f??
1f??
1f??
1f??
1ga
1ge
1gi
1go
1gu
1g??
1g??
1g??
1g??
1g??
1ha
1he
1hi
1ho
1hu
1h??
1h??
1h??
1h??
1h??
1ka
1ke
1ki
1ko
1ku
1k??
1k??
1k??
1k??
1k??
1la
1le
1li
1lo
1lu
1l??
1l??
1l??
1l??
1l??
1ma
1me
1mi
1mo
1mu
1m??
1m??
1m??
1m??
1m??
1na
1ne
1ni
1no
1nu
1n??
1n??
1n??
1n??
1n??
1pa
1pe
1pi
1po
1pu
1p??
1p??
1p??
1p??
1p??
1ra
1re
1ri
1ro
1ru
1r??
1r??
1r??
1r??
1r??
1sa
1se
1si
1so
1su
1s??
1s??
1s??
1s??
1s??
1ta
1te
1ti
1to
1tu
1t??
1t??
1t??
1t??
1t??
1va
1ve
1vi
1vo
1vu
1v??
1v??
1v??
1v??
1v??
1xa
1xe
1xi
1xo
1xu
1x??
1x??
1x??
1x??
1x??
1za
1ze
1zi
1zo
1zu
1z??
1z??
1z??
1z??
1z??
1qu2
1c2h
2ch.
1g2h
2gh.
2k2h
1b2l
1b2r
1c2l
1c2r
1d2l
1d2r
1f2l
1f2r
1g2l
1g2r
1k2l
1k2r
1p2l
1p2r
2t2l
1t2r
1v2l
1v2r
2bl.
2br.
2cl.
2cr.
2dl.
2dr.
2fl.
2fr.
2gl.
2gr.
2kl.
2kr.
2pl.
2pr.
2tr.
2vl.
2vr.
1l4l
2ll.
1r2r
2rr.
b1p2t
c1p2t
d1p2t
l1p2t
m1p2t
n1p2t
r1p2t
s1p2t
t1p2t
x1p2t
b1c2t
c1c2t
d1c2t
l1c2t
m1c2t
n1c2t
r1c2t
s1c2t
t1c2t
x1c2t
b1c2n
c1c2n
d1c2n
l1c2n
m1c2n
n1c2n
r1c2n
s1c2n
t1c2n
x1c2n
b1p2s
c1p2s
d1p2s
l1p2s
m1p2s
n1p2s
r1p2s
s1p2s
t1p2s
x1p2s
b1m2n
c1m2n
d1m2n
l1m2n
m1m2n
n1m2n
r1m2n
s1m2n
t1m2n
x1m2n
b1g2n
c1g2n
d1g2n
l1g2n
m1g2n
n1g2n
r1g2n
s1g2n
t1g2n
x1g2n
b1f2t
c1f2t
d1f2t
l1f2t
m1f2t
n1f2t
r1f2t
s1f2t
t1f2t
x1f2t
b1p2n
c1p2n
d1p2n
l1p2n
m1p2n
n1p2n
r1p2n
s1p2n
t1p2n
x1p2n
b1c2z
c1c2z
d1c2z
l1c2z
m1c2z
n1c2z
r1c2z
s1c2z
t1c2z
x1c2z
b1t2s
c1t2s
d1t2s
l1t2s
m1t2s
n1t2s
r1t2s
s1t2s
t1t2s
x1t2s
san2c3t
plan2c3t
2pt.
2ct.
2cn.
2ps.
2mn.
2gn.
2ft.
2pn.
2cz.
2ts.
un2ha
2non.
3mente.
o2hib
alde2h
4caca4
4cago4
4caga4
4cagas.
4puta4
4puto4
4meo.
4mea.
4meable.
4meables.
4peido4
acto1a2
acto1e2
acto1i2
acto1o2
acto1u2
acto1??2
acto1??2
acto1??2
acto1??2
acto1??2
afro1a2
afro1e2
afro1i2
afro1o2
afro1u2
afro1??2
afro1??2
afro1??2
afro1??2
afro1??2
aero1a2
aero1e2
aero1i2
aero1o2
aero1u2
aero1??2
aero1??2
aero1??2
aero1??2
aero1??2
anfi1a2
anfi1e2
anfi1i2
anfi1o2
anfi1u2
anfi1??2
anfi1??2
anfi1??2
anfi1??2
anfi1??2
anglo1a2
anglo1e2
anglo1i2
anglo1o2
anglo1u2
anglo1??2
anglo1??2
anglo1??2
anglo1??2
anglo1??2
.ante1a2
.ante1e2
.ante1i2
.ante1o2
.ante1u2
.ante1??2
.ante1??2
.ante1??2
.ante1??2
.ante1??2
.anti1a2
.anti1e2
.anti1i2
.anti1o2
.anti1u2
.anti1??2
.anti1??2
.anti1??2
.anti1??2
.anti1??2
.arqui1a2
.arqui1e2
.arqui1i2
.arqui1o2
.arqui1u2
.arqui1??2
.arqui1??2
.arqui1??2
.arqui1??2
.arqui1??2
auto1a2
auto1e2
auto1i2
auto1o2
auto1u2
auto1??2
auto1??2
auto1??2
auto1??2
auto1??2
biblio1a2
biblio1e2
biblio1i2
biblio1o2
biblio1u2
biblio1??2
biblio1??2
biblio1??2
biblio1??2
biblio1??2
bio1a2
bio1e2
bio1i2
bio1o2
bio1u2
bio1??2
bio1??2
bio1??2
bio1??2
bio1??2
cardio1a2
cardio1e2
cardio1i2
cardio1o2
cardio1u2
cardio1??2
cardio1??2
cardio1??2
cardio1??2
cardio1??2
cefalo1a2
cefalo1e2
cefalo1i2
cefalo1o2
cefalo1u2
cefalo1??2
cefalo1??2
cefalo1??2
cefalo1??2
cefalo1??2
ciclo1a2
ciclo1e2
ciclo1i2
ciclo1o2
ciclo1u2
ciclo1??2
ciclo1??2
ciclo1??2
ciclo1??2
ciclo1??2
cito1a2
cito1e2
cito1i2
cito1o2
cito1u2
cito1??2
cito1??2
cito1??2
cito1??2
cito1??2
.co1a2
.co1e2
.co1i2
.co1o2
.co1u2
.co1??2
.co1??2
.co1??2
.co1??2
contra1a2
contra1e2
contra1i2
contra1o2
contra1u2
contra1??2
contra1??2
contra1??2
contra1??2
contra1??2
cripto1a2
cripto1e2
cripto1i2
cripto1o2
cripto1u2
cripto1??2
cripto1??2
cripto1??2
cripto1??2
cripto1??2
cromo1a2
cromo1e2
cromo1i2
cromo1o2
cromo1u2
cromo1??2
cromo1??2
cromo1??2
cromo1??2
cromo1??2
crono1a2
crono1e2
crono1i2
crono1o2
crono1u2
crono1??2
crono1??2
crono1??2
crono1??2
crono1??2
deca1a2
deca1e2
deca1i2
deca1o2
deca1u2
deca1??2
deca1??2
deca1??2
deca1??2
deca1??2
.deza1a2
.deza1e2
.deza1i2
.deza1o2
.deza1u2
.deza1??2
.deza1??2
.deza1??2
.deza1??2
.deza1??2
dinamo1a2
dinamo1e2
dinamo1i2
dinamo1o2
dinamo1u2
dinamo1??2
dinamo1??2
dinamo1??2
dinamo1??2
dinamo1??2
ecano1a2
ecano1e2
ecano1i2
ecano1o2
ecano1u2
ecano1??2
ecano1??2
ecano1??2
ecano1??2
ecano1??2
eco1a2
eco1e2
eco1i2
eco1o2
eco1u2
eco1??2
eco1??2
eco1??2
eco1??2
eco1??2
electro1a2
electro1e2
electro1i2
electro1o2
electro1u2
electro1??2
electro1??2
electro1??2
electro1??2
electro1??2
endo1a2
endo1e2
endo1i2
endo1o2
endo1u2
endo1??2
endo1??2
endo1??2
endo1??2
endo1??2
ento1a2
ento1e2
ento1i2
ento1o2
ento1u2
ento1??2
ento1??2
ento1??2
ento1??2
ento1??2
entre1a2
entre1e2
entre1i2
entre1o2
entre1u2
entre1??2
entre1??2
entre1??2
entre1??2
entre1??2
euco1a2
euco1e2
euco1i2
euco1o2
euco1u2
euco1??2
euco1??2
euco1??2
euco1??2
euco1??2
euro1a2
euro1e2
euro1i2
euro1o2
euro1u2
euro1??2
euro1??2
euro1??2
euro1??2
euro1??2
extra1a2
extra1e2
extra1i2
extra1o2
extra1u2
extra1??2
extra1??2
extra1??2
extra1??2
extra1??2
fono1a2
fono1e2
fono1i2
fono1o2
fono1u2
fono1??2
fono1??2
fono1??2
fono1??2
fono1??2
foto1a2
foto1e2
foto1i2
foto1o2
foto1u2
foto1??2
foto1??2
foto1??2
foto1??2
foto1??2
franco1a2
franco1e2
franco1i2
franco1o2
franco1u2
franco1??2
franco1??2
franco1??2
franco1??2
franco1??2
gastro1a2
gastro1e2
gastro1i2
gastro1o2
gastro1u2
gastro1??2
gastro1??2
gastro1??2
gastro1??2
gastro1??2
xeo1a2
xeo1e2
xeo1i2
xeo1o2
xeo1u2
xeo1??2
xeo1??2
xeo1??2
xeo1??2
xeo1??2
hecto1a2
hecto1e2
hecto1i2
hecto1o2
hecto1u2
hecto1??2
hecto1??2
hecto1??2
hecto1??2
hecto1??2
helio1a2
helio1e2
helio1i2
helio1o2
helio1u2
helio1??2
helio1??2
helio1??2
helio1??2
helio1??2
hemato1a2
hemato1e2
hemato1i2
hemato1o2
hemato1u2
hemato1??2
hemato1??2
hemato1??2
hemato1??2
hemato1??2
hemi1a2
hemi1e2
hemi1i2
hemi1o2
hemi1u2
hemi1??2
hemi1??2
hemi1??2
hemi1??2
hemi1??2
hexa1a2
hexa1e2
hexa1i2
hexa1o2
hexa1u2
hexa1??2
hexa1??2
hexa1??2
hexa1??2
hexa1??2
hidro1a2
hidro1e2
hidro1i2
hidro1o2
hidro1u2
hidro1??2
hidro1??2
hidro1??2
hidro1??2
hidro1??2
hipe2r1a2
hipe2r1e2
hipe2r1i2
hipe2r1o2
hipe2r1u2
hipe2r1??2
hipe2r1??2
hipe2r1??2
hipe2r1??2
hipe2r1??2
histo1a2
histo1e2
histo1i2
histo1o2
histo1u2
histo1??2
histo1??2
histo1??2
histo1??2
histo1??2
homeo1a2
homeo1e2
homeo1i2
homeo1o2
homeo1u2
homeo1??2
homeo1??2
homeo1??2
homeo1??2
homeo1??2
homo1a2
homo1e2
homo1i2
homo1o2
homo1u2
homo1??2
homo1??2
homo1??2
homo1??2
homo1??2
ibero1a2
ibero1e2
ibero1i2
ibero1o2
ibero1u2
ibero1??2
ibero1??2
ibero1??2
ibero1??2
ibero1??2
icono1a2
icono1e2
icono1i2
icono1o2
icono1u2
icono1??2
icono1??2
icono1??2
icono1??2
icono1??2
.in1a2
.in1e2
.in1i2
.in1o2
.in1u2
.in1??2
.in1??2
.in1??2
.in1??2
.in1??2
.indo1a2
.indo1e2
.indo1i2
.indo1o2
.indo1u2
.indo1??2
.indo1??2
.indo1??2
.indo1??2
.indo1??2
infra1a2
infra1e2
infra1i2
infra1o2
infra1u2
infra1??2
infra1??2
infra1??2
infra1??2
infra1??2
.inte2r1a2
.inte2r1e2
.inte2r1i2
.inte2r1o2
.inte2r1u2
.inte2r1??2
.inte2r1??2
.inte2r1??2
.inte2r1??2
.inte2r1??2
intra1a2
intra1e2
intra1i2
intra1o2
intra1u2
intra1??2
intra1??2
intra1??2
intra1??2
intra1??2
.iso1a2
.iso1e2
.iso1i2
.iso1o2
.iso1u2
.iso1??2
.iso1??2
.iso1??2
.iso1??2
.iso1??2
kilo1a2
kilo1e2
kilo1i2
kilo1o2
kilo1u2
kilo1??2
kilo1??2
kilo1??2
kilo1??2
kilo1??2
macro1a2
macro1e2
macro1i2
macro1o2
macro1u2
macro1??2
macro1??2
macro1??2
macro1??2
macro1??2
magneto1a2
magneto1e2
magneto1i2
magneto1o2
magneto1u2
magneto1??2
magneto1??2
magneto1??2
magneto1??2
magneto1??2
maxi1a2
maxi1e2
maxi1i2
maxi1o2
maxi1u2
maxi1??2
maxi1??2
maxi1??2
maxi1??2
maxi1??2
mega1a2
mega1e2
mega1i2
mega1o2
mega1u2
mega1??2
mega1??2
mega1??2
mega1??2
mega1??2
megalo1a2
megalo1e2
megalo1i2
megalo1o2
megalo1u2
megalo1??2
megalo1??2
megalo1??2
megalo1??2
megalo1??2
melano1a2
melano1e2
melano1i2
melano1o2
melano1u2
melano1??2
melano1??2
melano1??2
melano1??2
melano1??2
micro1a2
micro1e2
micro1i2
micro1o2
micro1u2
micro1??2
micro1??2
micro1??2
micro1??2
micro1??2
mili1a2
mili1e2
mili1i2
mili1o2
mili1u2
mili1??2
mili1??2
mili1??2
mili1??2
mili1??2
mini1a2
mini1e2
mini1i2
mini1o2
mini1u2
mini1??2
mini1??2
mini1??2
mini1??2
mini1??2
multi1a2
multi1e2
multi1i2
multi1o2
multi1u2
multi1??2
multi1??2
multi1??2
multi1??2
multi1??2
miria1a2
miria1e2
miria1i2
miria1o2
miria1u2
miria1??2
miria1??2
miria1??2
miria1??2
miria1??2
mono1a2
mono1e2
mono1i2
mono1o2
mono1u2
mono1??2
mono1??2
mono1??2
mono1??2
mono1??2
.nano1a2
.nano1e2
.nano1i2
.nano1o2
.nano1u2
.nano1??2
.nano1??2
.nano1??2
.nano1??2
.nano1??2
necro1a2
necro1e2
necro1i2
necro1o2
necro1u2
necro1??2
necro1??2
necro1??2
necro1??2
necro1??2
.neo1a2
.neo1e2
.neo1i2
.neo1o2
.neo1u2
.neo1??2
.neo1??2
.neo1??2
.neo1??2
.neo1??2
norte1a2
norte1e2
norte1i2
norte1o2
norte1u2
norte1??2
norte1??2
norte1??2
norte1??2
norte1??2
octo1a2
octo1e2
octo1i2
octo1o2
octo1u2
octo1??2
octo1??2
octo1??2
octo1??2
octo1??2
octa1a2
octa1e2
octa1i2
octa1o2
octa1u2
octa1??2
octa1??2
octa1??2
octa1??2
octa1??2
omni1a2
omni1e2
omni1i2
omni1o2
omni1u2
omni1??2
omni1??2
omni1??2
omni1??2
omni1??2
paleo1a2
paleo1e2
paleo1i2
paleo1o2
paleo1u2
paleo1??2
paleo1??2
paleo1??2
paleo1??2
paleo1??2
para1a2
para1e2
para1i2
para1o2
para1u2
para1??2
para1??2
para1??2
para1??2
para1??2
penta1a2
penta1e2
penta1i2
penta1o2
penta1u2
penta1??2
penta1??2
penta1??2
penta1??2
penta1??2
piezo1a2
piezo1e2
piezo1i2
piezo1o2
piezo1u2
piezo1??2
piezo1??2
piezo1??2
piezo1??2
piezo1??2
pluri1a2
pluri1e2
pluri1i2
pluri1o2
pluri1u2
pluri1??2
pluri1??2
pluri1??2
pluri1??2
pluri1??2
poli1a2
poli1e2
poli1i2
poli1o2
poli1u2
poli1??2
poli1??2
poli1??2
poli1??2
poli1??2
.pos2t1a2
.pos2t1e2
.pos2t1i2
.pos2t1o2
.pos2t1u2
.pos2t1??2
.pos2t1??2
.pos2t1??2
.pos2t1??2
.pos2t1??2
.pre1a2
.pre1e2
.pre1i2
.pre1o2
.pre1u2
.pre1??2
.pre1??2
.pre1??2
.pre1??2
.pro1a2
.pro1e2
.pro1i2
.pro1o2
.pro1u2
.pro1??2
.pro1??2
.pro1??2
.pro1??2
.pro1??2
proto1a2
proto1e2
proto1i2
proto1o2
proto1u2
proto1??2
proto1??2
proto1??2
proto1??2
proto1??2
pseudo1a2
pseudo1e2
pseudo1i2
pseudo1o2
pseudo1u2
pseudo1??2
pseudo1??2
pseudo1??2
pseudo1??2
pseudo1??2
radio1a2
radio1e2
radio1i2
radio1o2
radio1u2
radio1??2
radio1??2
radio1??2
radio1??2
radio1??2
.re1a2
.re1e2
.re1i2
.re1o2
.re1u2
.re1??2
.re1??2
.re1??2
.re1??2
.re1??2
retro1a2
retro1e2
retro1i2
retro1o2
retro1u2
retro1??2
retro1??2
retro1??2
retro1??2
retro1??2
sobre1a2
sobre1e2
sobre1i2
sobre1o2
sobre1u2
sobre1??2
sobre1??2
sobre1??2
sobre1??2
sobre1??2
semi1a2
semi1e2
semi1i2
semi1o2
semi1u2
semi1??2
semi1??2
semi1??2
semi1??2
semi1??2
socio1a2
socio1e2
socio1i2
socio1o2
socio1u2
socio1??2
socio1??2
socio1??2
socio1??2
socio1??2
.su2b1a2
.su2b1e2
.su2b1o2
.su2b1u2
.su2b1??2
.su2b1??2
.su2b1??2
.su2b1??2
supe2r1a2
supe2r1e2
supe2r1i2
supe2r1o2
supe2r1u2
supe2r1??2
supe2r1??2
supe2r1??2
supe2r1??2
supe2r1??2
supra1a2
supra1e2
supra1i2
supra1o2
supra1u2
supra1??2
supra1??2
supra1??2
supra1??2
supra1??2
.tele1a2
.tele1e2
.tele1i2
.tele1o2
.tele1u2
.tele1??2
.tele1??2
.tele1??2
.tele1??2
.tele1??2
termo1a2
termo1e2
termo1i2
termo1o2
termo1u2
termo1??2
termo1??2
termo1??2
termo1??2
termo1??2
tetra1a2
tetra1e2
tetra1i2
tetra1o2
tetra1u2
tetra1??2
tetra1??2
tetra1??2
tetra1??2
tetra1??2
topo1a2
topo1e2
topo1i2
topo1o2
topo1u2
topo1??2
topo1??2
topo1??2
topo1??2
topo1??2
.tri1a2
.tri1e2
.tri1i2
.tri1o2
.tri1u2
.tri1??2
.tri1??2
.tri1??2
.tri1??2
.tri1??2
tropo1a2
tropo1e2
tropo1i2
tropo1o2
tropo1u2
tropo1??2
tropo1??2
tropo1??2
tropo1??2
tropo1??2
ultra1a2
ultra1e2
ultra1i2
ultra1o2
ultra1u2
ultra1??2
ultra1??2
ultra1??2
ultra1??2
ultra1??2
xeno1a2
xeno1e2
xeno1i2
xeno1o2
xeno1u2
xeno1??2
xeno1??2
xeno1??2
xeno1??2
xeno1??2
hiper3r
.inter3r
super3r
ti2o3qu
ti2o3co
bi1u2n??
o2i3de
o2i3dal
2al.
2a2is.
pe3r2e3mia
libero2u3
atopo2u3
enaxeno2u3
2os.
2o3so.
2o3sos.
2o3sa.
2o3sas.
2o3samente.
2i3co.
2i3cos.
2i3ca.
2i3cas.
.co2ar
.co2??2
.co2ab??
.co2acerv
.co2andro
.co2ano
.co2a??ar
.co2a??o
.co2art
.co2etan
.co2enci
.co2erci
.co2inci
.co2ira
.co2iro
.co2ita
co2a3gul
co2??3gul
co2a3la.
co2a3las.
co2a3lescen
co2a3lici??n.
co2a3licions.
co2a3na.
co2a3nas.
co2antri??
co2a3??adeir
co2a3t??.
co2a3t??s.
co2e3ficien
co2e3lernos.
co2e3llo.
co2e3lla.
co2e3llos.
co2e3llas.
